Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 3. Benefits
§ 27-3-311.
Disqualifications from entitlement; grounds; forfeiture.

An individual shall be disqualified from benefit entitlement beginning with the effective date of an otherwise valid claim or the week during which the failure occurred, until he has been employed in an employee-employer relationship and has earned at least eight (8) times the weekly benefit amount of his current claim for services after that date, if the department finds that he:

Left his most recent work voluntarily without good cause attributable directly to his employment, except:

For bona fide medical reasons involving his health;

If returning to approved training which meets the requirements of W.S.

27-3-307

;

If forced to leave the most recent work as a result of being a victim of documented domestic violence; or

If unemployed as a result of relocation due to the transfer of the unemployed individual’s spouse, either within or outside the state, from which it is impractical to commute to the place of employment, and upon arrival at the new residence, the individual is in all respects able and available for suitable work and registers for work with the department of workforce services or an equivalent agency of another state where the individual is residing. To qualify under this subparagraph, the individual shall be married to a member of the United States armed forces whose relocation is the result of an assignment on active duty as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101(d)(1), active guard or reserve duty as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101(d)(6), active duty pursuant to title 10 of the United States Code, or training or other duty performed by a member of the army national guard of the United States or the air national guard of the United States under section 316, 502, 503, 504 or 505 of title 32 of the United States Code. Any benefits awarded under this subparagraph shall be noncharged benefits and shall not affect an employer’s experience rating account.

Failed without good cause to apply for available suitable work;

Failed without good cause to accept any offer of suitable work;

Repealed by Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3.

Following four (4) weeks of unemployment, failed to apply for or accept an offer of suitable work other than in his customary occupation offering at least fifty percent (50%) of the compensation of his previous insured work in his customary occupation; or

Following twelve (12) weeks of unemployment, as a member of a labor organization fails to apply for or accept suitable nonunion work in his customary occupation.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 73, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 19, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 175, § 3.

Any person who knowingly files a claim for benefits which contains a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact, as determined by the department, shall be disqualified from receiving benefits for a fifty-two (52) week period beginning the week in which the false statement or misrepresentation was made or beginning the week following the date that notice of the overpayment is mailed to the person who filed the claim.

An individual shall be disqualified from benefit entitlement beginning with the effective date of an otherwise valid claim or the week during which the failure occurred, until he has been employed in an employee-employer relationship and has earned at least twelve (12) times the weekly benefit amount of his current claim for services after that date, if the department finds that he was discharged from his most recent work for misconduct connected with his work.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 5; 1939, ch. 124, § 10; 1941, ch. 96, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-105; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 5; 1953, ch. 111, § 4; 1957, ch. 88, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-26; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 5; 1967, ch. 175, § 2; 1969, ch. 58, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, § 13; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 2, 3; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, §§ 1, 3; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 161, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, § 1; 2018 ch. 110, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(i)(D).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e), inserted “beginning the week following,” and deleted “determination or decision” following “the overpayment.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (a)(i)(D), deleted the last sentence, which read: “This subparagraph is repealed effective July 1, 2018.”

Laws 2018, ch. 110, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4 reads: “The legislature reserves the right to amend, modify or repeal all or any part of the Wyoming Employment Security Law at any time. There is no vested private right of any kind under that act.”

Laws 2009, ch. 161, § 2 provides: “The department of employment, unemployment insurance division, shall maintain records regarding the number of individuals claiming and awarded benefits and the amount of benefits awarded to individuals under W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D), created by section 1 of this act.
Not later than December 31, 2010 and not later than each December 31 of each year thereafter that benefits are provided under W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D), the department shall submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, detailing the number of claimants and amounts awarded pursuant to W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D).”

Approved training. —

District court properly upheld the Unemployment Insurance Commission’s denial of an employee’s request for unemployment benefits because he left work voluntarily after his employer could not accommodate his request for alternate hours or a new position to support his school schedule, and he did not qualify for the exception return “to approved training” where his enrollment in a nursing program absent the required determination did not meet the conditions of the statutory exception. Gerber v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2020 WY 90, 467 P.3d 153,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2020).

Misconduct connected with work.—

Denial of
an applicant's request for unemployment insurance benefits was appropriate
because the applicant was fired for misconduct connected with the
applicant's work in that the applicant intentionally disregarded
the
employer's interest and/or the applicant's commonly accepted
duties.
Although a supervisor informed the applicant of the importance
of
not mixing product when the applicant was hired as a fuel truck
driver,
and the applicant was trained in how to unload fuel, the
applicant
twice mixed product when employed for two months. Clark v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 89, 378 P.3d 310,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2016).

Denial of applicant’s request for unemployment insurance benefits was appropriate because the applicant was discharged for misconduct connected with the applicant’s work as a police dispatcher in that the applicant disclosed documents containing confidential information to a city council member, who was not authorized to receive them. The applicant showed an intentional disregard for the city’s and police department’s interests in protecting confidential information and maintaining the chain of command to address reported policy violations. Mahoney v. City of Gillette, 2019 WY 28, 436 P.3d 444,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2019).

Resignation effective at a future date. —

Unemployment insurance commission was required to follow its existing precedent concerning situations where employee gives a resignation notice effective at a future date, but employer terminates employee before that date is reached. Pette v. State ex rel. Department of Empl., 968 P.2d 952,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1998).

To show “good cause,”

as that term is used in subsection (a), evidence presented must demonstrate such a cause as justifies an employee's voluntarily leaving the ranks of the employed and joining the ranks of the unemployed; the quitting must be for such a cause as would reasonably motivate, in a similar situation, the average able-bodied and qualified worker to give up his employment with its certain wage rewards in order to enter the ranks of the compensated unemployed. Sage Club v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979).

Employee's conviction that his employer was erroneously withholding wages constituted “good cause”

under subsection (a)(i). Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984).

Unsafe place to work could constitute good cause

for a voluntary work termination. Beddow v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 718 P.2d 12,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 530

(Wyo. 1986).

Employees had good cause to resign, where their employer had harassed them

in retaliation for their support of a former co-employee following his discharge and his subsequent proceedings before the commission (now department), wherein he successfully sought unemployment benefits. Southwest Wyo. Rehabilitation Ctr. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 781 P.2d 918,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1989).

Unwelcome sexual advances constituted good cause. —

The claimant had good cause to leave her employment on the basis of unwelcome sexual advances by the president of the employer and the increasing number of violent episodes by the vice-president of the employer. Hat Six Homes, Inc. v. Department of Empl., 6 P.3d 1287,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2000).

Statement of employee not misconduct. —

Unemployment insurance commission properly determined that statement of claimant was not an actual threat, and therefore did not constitute misconduct disqualifying him from receiving unemployment benefits. Wyoming Dep't of Empl., Unemployment Ins. Comm'n v. SF Phosphates, Ltd., 976 P.2d 199,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1999).

No known obligation or responsibility shown. —

Unemployment benefits should have been awarded to a claimant because he did not commit misconduct in connection to an incident that arose while he was performing off-duty security work; there was no sheriff's department policy or procedure that specifically required photographs to be taken at the scene or that the claimant check on a victim's condition at a hospital. There had to be evidence of a known obligation or responsibility, as well as a willful and intentional failure to comply.
State v. Laramie County (In re Ringrose), 2013 WY 68, 302 P.3d 900,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2013).

Substantial
evidence did not support a denial of an employee's unemployment insurance
benefits claim because it was unreasonable to find the employee engaged
in misconduct by chipping the motor fin on the employer's bike and
installing a dented cylinder on a customer's bike, as the employer
did not know of these acts when the employee was fired, so there
was
no evidence of a known obligation or responsibility and a willful
and intentional failure to comply. Doggett v. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2014 WY 119, 334 P.3d 1231,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2014).

Refusal to submit to urine test not misconduct. —

An employee's refusal to submit to a urine test was not misconduct, where the employer's demand to the employee that he yield up a sample of his urine to their corporate physician for analysis or resign on the spot was unreasonable and where there was no established company policy requiring, as a condition of the employment, any submission to either random testing for intoxicants or such testing based upon a reasonable and particularized suspicion. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Western Gas Processors, 786 P.2d 866,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1990).

Refusal to take drug/alcohol test not misconduct. —

Refusal to take a drug/alcohol test which was not brought about in accordance with the employer's established policy is not “misconduct” which will disqualify that employee from receiving unemployment compensation benefits. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Div. of Unemployment Ins. v. Risser & McMurry Co., 837 P.2d 686,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1992).

Changes in work routine not “good cause.” —

As a general rule, changes in customary working conditions not involving deceit or wrongful conduct on the part of the employer are not a sufficient reason for an employee voluntarily to leave work. Sage Club v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979).

Trivial changes in an employee's work routine do not constitute “good cause” to quit work and collect unemployment benefits. Sage Club v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979).

Walking off job following confrontation, deemed “misconduct.” —

While showing up for work on one occasion with little rest after a night at a bar might not in itself constitute “misconduct,” walking off the job after being confronted by a senior employee about the effects of such behavior is misconduct. Roberts v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 1355,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 552

(Wyo. 1987).

Unintended or accidental work-rule violation, with consequent discharge, does not constitute statutory misconduct

for denial of unemployment-benefit payment. Safety Medical Servs. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 724 P.2d 468,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 609

(Wyo. 1986).

Employee who quits after minor, isolated altercation with fellow employee disqualified for benefits. —

The decision of the commission to disqualify an employee for benefits for voluntarily leaving his employment without good cause was supported by evidence that the employee was involved in a minor, isolated altercation with a fellow employee, was not injured, but quit his job. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Bryant, 704 P.2d 1311,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 546

(Wyo. 1985).

Employee blocking main entrance disqualified from benefits. —

An employee who blocks the main entrance to a mine site may be disqualified from benefit entitlement. Such conduct indicates a disregard for the mining company's interests and, therefore, amounts to misconduct under this section. Barker v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 791 P.2d 583,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1990).

Employer's pulling of time card precluded employee misconduct. —

Employer's “pulling” of employee's time card effectively terminated employee's employment and precluded an administrative finding that employee had voluntarily left without good cause, especially in light of additional evidence that employee had filled out a temporary absentee form in advance and had reacted in an abrupt manner with obscene language upon notification of his termination. Casper Iron & Metal v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n of Dep't of Employment, 845 P.2d 387,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1993).

Misrepresentation. —

Claimant for unemployment compensation benefits was disqualified under § 27-3-311(e) where the claimant stated on his application that he did not work for wages, but rather, he rented his welding equipment and then operated it for free. Judge v. Dep't of Empl., 2002 WY 109, 50 P.3d 686,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2002).

Claimant's testimony substantial evidence. —

Unemployment Insurance Commission's acceptance of claimant's testimony could have found such to be substantial evidence indicating that the claimant did not engage in misconduct such that he should be denied unemployment benefits. City of Casper v. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Unemployment Ins. Div., 851 P.2d 1,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1993).

Failure to write report not misconduct. —

Unemployment benefits should have been awarded to a claimant because he did not commit misconduct under this section in connection to an incident that arose while he was performing off-duty security work since a sheriff's department policy did not establish a violation when the claimant did not write a report until ordered to do so. A violation occurred only if a report was not submitted by the last workday of the claimant's workweek. State v. Laramie County (In re Ringrose), 2013 WY 68, 302 P.3d 900,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2013).

Isolated incident of ordinary negligence was not misconduct. —

Pursuant to review under Wyo. R. App. P. 12.09(a) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-114(c), there was substantial evidence supporting a claimant's award of unemployment insurance benefits because irrelevant evidence of an alleged conspiracy was properly excluded under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-108(a) and claimant's conduct was determined to be ordinary negligence in an isolated instance and not misconduct under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-3-311(f). Further, the hearing officer complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-112(a) to provide the claimant's former employer with a fair and impartial hearing.
Aspen Ridge Law Offices, P.C. v. Wyo. Dep't of Empl., 2006 WY 129, 143 P.3d 911,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Sierra Trading Post, Inc. v. Hinson,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 27

, 996 P.2d 1144 (Wyo. 2000).

Quoted

in

Weidner v. Life Care Ctrs. of Am., 893 P.2d 706,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 906 P.2d 380,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1995); Nathan v. Am. Global Univ., 2005 WY 64, 113 P.3d 32,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect on right to unemployment compensation benefits of receipt of subsistence allowance under Federal Servicemen's Readjustment Act, 21 ALR2d 1072.

Right to unemployment compensation of one working on own projects or activities, 65 ALR2d 1182.

Harassment or garnishment by employee's creditor as constituting misconduct connected with employment so as to disqualify employee for unemployment compensation, 86 ALR2d 1013.

Effect on right to state unemployment compensation benefits of receipt of payments under private supplemental unemployment benefit plans, 91 ALR2d 1211.

Employee's insubordination as barring unemployment compensation, 26 ALR3d 1333, 20 ALR4th 637.

Work-connected inefficiency or negligence as “misconduct” barring unemployment compensation, 26 ALR3d 1356.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by receipt of pension, 56 ALR3d 520.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by receipt of social security benefits, 56 ALR3d 552.

Eligibility of strikers to obtain public assistance, 57 ALR3d 1303.

Discharge for absenteeism or tardiness as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 58 ALR3d 674.

Eligibility of participants in sympathy strike or slowdown, 61 ALR3d 746.

Labor dispute disqualification as applicable to striking employee who is laid off subsequent to employment during strike period, 61 ALR3d 766.

Refusal of nonstriking employees to cross picket line as justifying denial of unemployment compensation benefits, 62 ALR3d 380.

Application of labor dispute disqualification for benefits to locked out employee, 62 ALR3d 437.

General principles pertaining to statutory disqualification for unemployment compensation benefits because of strike or labor dispute, 63 ALR3d 88.

Unemployment compensation: harassment or other mistreatment by employer or supervisor as “good cause” justifying abandonment of employment, 76 ALR3d 1089.

Use of vulgar or profane language as bar to claim for unemployment compensation, 92 ALR3d 106.

Eligibility as affected by refusal to accept employment at compensation less than that of previous job, 94 ALR3d 63.

Unemployment compensation: eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at reduced compensation, 95 ALR3d 449.

Eligibility as affected by mental, nervous, or psychological disorder, 1 ALR4th 802.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by claimant's receipt of holiday pay, 3 ALR4th 557.

Leaving or refusing employment for religious reasons as barring unemployment compensation, 12 ALR4th 611.

Leaving or refusing employment because of allergic reaction as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 12 ALR4th 629.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by employee's refusal to work in areas where smoking is permitted, 14 ALR4th 1234.

Right to unemployment compensation of one who quit job because not given enough work to keep busy, 15 ALR4th 256.

Employee's refusal to take lie detector test as barring unemployment compensation, 18 ALR4th 307.

Employee's act or threat of physical violence as bar to unemployment compensation, 20 ALR4th 637.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation as affected by voluntary resignation because of change of location of residence, 21 ALR4th 317.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by misrepresentation in original employment application, 23 ALR4th 1272.

Discharge from employment on ground of political views or conduct as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 29 ALR4th 287.

Unemployment compensation: termination of employment, known to be for a specific, limited duration, upon expiration of period, as voluntary, 30 ALR4th 1201.

Conduct or activities of employees during off-duty hours as misconduct barring unemployment compensation benefits, 35 ALR4th 691.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation benefits of employee who attempts to withdraw resignation before leaving employment, 36 ALR4th 395.

Alcoholism or intoxication as ground for discharge justifying denial of unemployment compensation, 64 ALR4th 1151.

Unemployment compensation: burden of proof as to voluntariness of separation, 73 ALR4th 1093.

Employee's use of drugs or narcotics, or related problems, as affecting eligibility for unemployment compensation, 78 ALR4th 180.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation of employee who left employment based on belief that involuntary discharge was imminent, 79 ALR4th 528.

Unemployment compensation: eligibility where claimant leaves employment under circumstances interpreted as a firing by the claimant but as a voluntary quit by the employer, 80 ALR4th 7.

Private employee's loss of employment because of refusal to submit to drug test as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 86 ALR4th 309.

Validity, construction, and effect of state laws requiring payment of wages on resignation of employee immediately or within specified period, 11 ALR5th 715.

Unemployment compensation claimant's eligibility as affected by loss of, or failure to obtain, license, certificate or similar qualification for continued employment, 15 ALR5th 653.

Employee's control or ownership of corporation as precluding receipt of benefits under state unemployment compensation provisions, 23 ALR5th 176.

Right to unemployment compensation or social security benefits of teacher or other school employee, 33 ALR5th 643.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation as affected by claimant's voluntary separation or refusal to work alleging that the work is illegal or immoral, 41 ALR5th 123.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment to become self-employed or to go into business for oneself as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 45 ALR5th 715.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of other employment as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 46 ALR5th 659.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of education or to attend training as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 47 ALR5th 775.

Leaving employment or unavailability for particular job or duties because of sickness or disability, as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 68 ALR5th 13.

Work-related inefficiency, incompetence, or negligence as “misconduct” barring unemployment compensation, 95 ALR5th 329.

Use of employer's e-mail or internet system as misconduct precluding unemployment compensation, 106 ALR5th 297.

Unemployment compensation: Harassment or other mistreatment by coworker as “good cause” justifying abandonment of employment,
121 ALR 5th 467.

Conduct or activities of employees during off-duty hours as misconduct barring unemployment compensation benefits. 18 A.L.R.6th 195.

Eligibility for compensation as affected by voluntary resignation because of change of location of residence under statute conditioning benefits upon leaving for “good cause attributable to the employer”,
26 A.L.R.6th 111.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation as affected by voluntary resignation because of change of location of residence under statute denying benefits to certain claimants based on particular disqualifying motive for move or unavailability for,
27 A.L.R.6th 123.

Construction and application of Employee Polygraph Protection Act of 1988 (29 USC §§ 2001 et seq.) 154 ALR Fed 315.

§ 27-3-312.
Determination of suitable work.

In determining if work is suitable for purposes of W.S. 27-3-311(a), the department shall consider:

The risk involved to an individual’s health, safety and morals;

The individual’s physical fitness;

The length of unemployment of the individual;

The prospects for securing local employment in the individual’s customary occupation;

The distance of available employment from the individual’s residence; and

If the individual is capable of performing the work.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, work is not suitable if:

It is available because of a strike, lockout or other labor dispute;

The wages, hours or other conditions are substantially less favorable for the individual than those prevailing for similar work within the locality; or

An individual is required to join a company union or resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization as a condition for employment.

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 3.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 5; 1939, ch. 124, § 10; 1941, ch. 96, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-105; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 5; 1953, ch. 111, § 4; 1957, ch. 88, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-26; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 5; 1967, ch. 175, § 2; 1969, ch. 58, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, § 13; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1984, ch. 50, §§ 2, 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Unemployment compensation: Eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at particular times or on particular shifts for domestic or family reasons 2 ALR5th 475.

§ 27-3-313.
Other grounds for disqualification.

For any week with respect to which the following situations occur or payments have been or will be received, an individual shall be disqualified from benefit entitlement if:

Total or part total unemployment for any week is due to work stoppage resulting from a labor dispute on the employment premises at which he was last employed. This paragraph does not apply if the department finds the individual is not participating in, financing or directly interested in the labor dispute and is not a member of a grade or class of workers with members employed on the premises and participating in, financing or directly interested in the dispute. If separate types of work commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each department is a separate premises under this paragraph;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 73, § 2.

Unemployment benefits are applied for or received under law of another state or the federal government. This paragraph does not apply if the other state or the federal government determines the individual is not entitled to benefits or to benefits received under an agreement between this state and the federal government pursuant to law;

Self-employed for profit in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business for more than three (3) days in any week or net earnings from self-employment are in excess of the weekly benefit amount. If net earnings computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00) are less than the weekly benefit amount, the individual is entitled to an amount reduced by the net earnings;

Retirement annuities, pensions or other payments are received from a base period employer or any trust or fund contributed to by a base period employer, and the individual made no contribution to the annuity, pension or other payment. Lump sum payments of retirement annuities, pensions or other payments which are rolled over into other private funds and which are not deemed income by the internal revenue service shall not be deducted under this subsection. If the payments decreased to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00) are less than the weekly benefit amount otherwise due under this article, the individual is entitled to benefits in an amount reduced by the payments.

Payments received under this section shall be allocated pursuant to the regulations of the commission.

The individual shall be disqualified from benefit entitlement during any week for which the individual has filed a claim for benefits and remuneration is received as a severance payment, termination allowance, sick pay or earned vacation. If the remuneration decreased to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00) is less than the weekly benefit amount, the amount of the payment shall be deducted from the amount of benefits the individual would otherwise be entitled to receive during that week.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 5; 1939, ch. 124, § 10; 1941, ch. 96, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-105; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 5; 1953, ch. 111, § 4; 1957, ch. 88, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-26; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 5; 1967, ch. 175, § 2; 1969, ch. 58, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, § 13; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1992, ch. 86 § 1; 2003, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2.

“Work stoppage.” —

“Work stoppage” refers to a worker's decision to withhold his or her services. General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 906 P.2d 380,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1995).

The phrase “work stoppage,” as that phrase is used in subsection (a)(i) of this section, refers to a worker's decision to stop working as a result of a labor dispute. General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 906 P.2d 380,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1995).

Legislative intent was to include “lockout” within “work stoppage resulting from labor dispute”

as provided in subsection (a)(i). Wilcoxson v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 741 P.2d 611,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 522

(Wyo. Sept. 30, 1987).

Employee terminated during work stoppage. —

A claimant who is initially disqualified for unemployment benefits due to his participation in a work stoppage may become eligible for benefits despite the continuation of the work stoppage if the employee's relationship with the employer is terminated. Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

Severance pay. —

An individual is disqualified from receiving unemployment benefits when an employer makes a severance payment. Bettcher v. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, 884 P.2d 635,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1994).

Employee unjustly fired may withdraw retirement contributions.—

The department should have granted unemployment benefits to a former employee fired without cause, and should not have offset these benefits against the employee's withdrawal of retirement contributions. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Div. of Unemployment Ins. v. Secrest, 811 P.2d 733,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1991) (decided prior to 1992 amendment).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment to become self-employed or to go into business for oneself as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 45 ALR5th 715.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of other employment as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 46 ALR5th 659.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of education or to attend training as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 47 ALR5th 775.

§ 27-3-314.
Extended benefit period; state “on” and “off” indicators; notice.

An extended benefit period begins with the third week following a week in which there is a state “on” indicator and ends with the third week after the first week in which there is a state “off” indicator or the thirteenth consecutive week of the extended benefit period, whichever occurs later. An extended benefit period may not begin until the fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period.

A state “on” indicator for a week exists if the insured unemployment rate under this act for that week and the preceding twelve (12) weeks is equal to or greater than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the average rates for the corresponding thirteen (13) week period ending in each of the preceding two (2) calendar years and is equal to or greater than five percent (5%). A state “off” indicator for a week exists if either of the conditions for the existence of a state “on” indicator is not satisfied for that week and the preceding twelve (12) weeks. The insured unemployment rate under this subsection is the average weekly number of individuals filing unemployment claims for regular compensation in this state for the most recent thirteen (13) consecutive week period divided by the average monthly employment covered under this act for the first four (4) of the most recent six (6) completed calendar quarters ending before the end of the thirteen (13) week period. Computations required for the insured unemployment rate shall be made by the department in accordance with regulations of the United States secretary of labor.

The department shall provide prior public notice of the beginning and the end of an extended benefit period within this state.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-3-315.
When individual deemed exhaustee; matters excluded from determination of regular benefits.

An individual is an exhaustee under this article for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period if he has:

Received prior to that week all regular benefits available to him under this article or any other state law in his applicable benefit year which includes that week; or

Prior to that week and after cancellation of part or all of his wage credits or reduction of part or all of his regular benefit rights, received all regular benefits available to him under this article or any other state law in his applicable benefit year which includes that week; or

Insufficient wages, employment or both, his benefit year ended prior to that week and he is eligible for a new benefit year in any state which includes that week or, having established a new benefit year which includes that week, he is not eligible for regular benefits under W.S. 27-3-306(d) or similar provisions of other state laws meeting the requirement of 26 U.S.C. § 3304(a)(7); and

No unemployment benefit or allowance rights under 45 U.S.C. § 351 et seq., 19 U.S.C. § 1801 et seq. or other federal laws specified under regulation of the United States secretary of labor; and

Not received or claimed unemployment benefits for that week under unemployment compensation laws of the Virgin Islands or Canada unless determined ineligible for these benefits.

An individual shall have received all regular benefits under paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section regardless of:

Any pending appeal for wages or employment not included in the original regular benefit amount for his current benefit year which may entitle him to additional regular benefits;

Any seasonal provision of another state law disqualifying him from regular benefits for that week of unemployment although he may be entitled to future benefits in the next season or off-season in his applicable benefit year, and he is otherwise an exhaustee under this section for regular benefits under state law seasonal provisions during the season or off-season in which that week of unemployment occurs; or

Any disqualification cancelling his wage credits or reducing all rights to regular benefits for his established benefit year.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).